District of Columbia statutes.
42-3131.09

Fees.

(a)

As provided in § 42-3131.06(a), the owner of a building shall register the building and pay the registration fee within 30 days after it becomes a vacant building, except if the vacant building is owned by the government of the United States or its instrumentalities or by a foreign government or its instrumentalities. The Mayor, in his or her sole discretion, may extend the time for payment for good cause.

(b)

Registrations shall be renewed annually from date of initial issuance unless there is a change in ownership.

(c)

The initial registration fee shall be $250.

(d)

The renewal registration fee shall be $250.

History

Apr. 14, 1906, 34 Stat. 115, ch. 1626, § 9
as added Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 101, 48 DCR 1888
Aug. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-216, § 3(e), 55 DCR 7500
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2042(c), 57 DCR 6242

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-3131.06, § 42-3131.10, and § 42-3131.14.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-216, in subsec. (d), substituted “§ 42-3131.08” for “§ 42-3131.11”.
D.C. Law 18-223 rewrote the section.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(e) of Nuisance Properties Abatement Reform and Real Property Classification Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-259, March 8, 2007, law notification 54 DCR 3044).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(e) of Nuisance Properties Abatement Reform and Real Property Classification Temporary Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-102, February 2, 2008, law notification 55 DCR 4254).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(e) of Nuisance Properties Abatement Reform and Real Property Classification Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-586, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 353).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(e) of Nuisance Properties Abatement Reform and Real Property Classification Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-173, November 2, 2007, 54 DCR 11204).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(e) of Nuisance Properties Abatement Reform and Real Property Classification Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-436, July 16, 2008, 55 DCR 8272).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2042(c) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).